District of Columbia statutes.
3-1204.03

Limitation on consecutive terms.

No member of a board or advisory committee shall be appointed to serve more than 3 full consecutive 3-year terms; provided, that the Mayor may appoint a member of a board to serve more than 3 full terms if considered necessary.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 403, 33 DCR 729
July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-26, § 2(d)(1), 56 DCR 4043

Section References

This section is referenced in § 3-1202.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3304.3.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-26 substituted “terms; provided, that the Mayor may appoint a member of a board to serve more than 3 full terms if considered necessary” for “terms”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d)(1) of Health Occupations Revision General Amendment Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-146, July 28, 2009, 56 DCR 6308).